Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
SPECIAL PROVISIONS

§421C-11 Forms. The department of
commerce and consumer affairs may prescribe and furnish on request forms for
documents required or permitted to be filed by this chapter. The director of
commerce and consumer affairs may require that the use of these forms be
mandatory. [L 1982, c 97, pt of §2 and c 204, §8; am L 2003, c 124, §45]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next